src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/en-gb-g1.utb
# liblouis: U.K. English Grade 1 table
#
# ------------
#-name: British English grade 1
#-index-name: English, U.K., uncontracted
#-display-name: English uncontracted braille as used in the U.K.
#
#+language:en
#+region:en-GB
#+type:literary
#+contraction:no
#+grade:1
#+system:bauk
# Marked as "direction:forward" by Bue Vester-Andersen
# as tests only run forward.
#+direction:forward
#
# TODO: Please correct the metadata above. It is not meant to be
# accurate nor complete. It hasn't been verified by the table
# author yet. It is merely an attempt by the liblouis maintainers
# to get some sensible initial values in place.
#
# TODO: Please add a reference to official documentation about
# the implemented braille code. Preferably submit the documents
# to https://github.com/liblouis/braille-specs.
# ------------
#
# Based on the braille contraction modules in BRLTTY
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team.
# Copyright (C) 2004 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc., www.viewplustech.com
# Copyright (C) 2004 Computers to Help People, Inc., www.chpi.org

# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.

# This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this file; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA  02110-1301  USA
# liblouis  comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.

# Maintained by Paul Wood, Torch Trust: paulw torchtrust.org

include text_nabcc.dis All display opcodes

include ukchardefs.cti All character definition opcodes


# accented letters

lowercase \x00E0 1				# a with grave
lowercase \x00E1 1				# a with acute
lowercase \x00E2 1				# a with circumflex
lowercase \x00E3 1				# a with tilde
lowercase \x00E4 1				# a with dieresis
lowercase \x00E5 1				# a with ring above
lowercase \x00E6 1				# letter ae
lowercase \x00E7 14				# c with cedilla
lowercase \x00E8 15				# e with grave
lowercase \x00E9 15				# e with acute
lowercase \x00EA 15				# e with circumflex
lowercase \x00EB 15				# e with dieresis
lowercase \x00EC 24				# i with grave above
lowercase \x00ED 24				# i with acute above
lowercase \x00EE 24				# i with circumflex
lowercase \x00EF 24				# i with dieresis
lowercase \x00F0 15				# letter eth
lowercase \x00F1 1345			# n with tilde
lowercase \x00F2 135			# o with grave above
lowercase \x00F3 135			# o with acute above
lowercase \x00F4 135			# o with circumflex
lowercase \x00F5 135			# o with tilde
lowercase \x00F6 135			# o with dieresis

# \x00D7	× multiplication sign	----------------------

lowercase \x00F8 135			# o with stroke
lowercase \x00F9 136			# u with grave above
lowercase \x00FA 136			# u with acute above
lowercase \x00FB 136			# u with circumflex above
lowercase \x00FC 136				# u with dieeresis
lowercase \x00FD 13456		# y with acute above
lowercase \x00FE 2345			# letter thorn
letter \x00DF 2346		# small sharp s
lowercase \x0175 2456 w with circumflex
lowercase \x0177 13456 # y with circumflex
lowercase \x00ff 13456 # y with diaeresis
lowercase \x1EF3 13456 # y with grave

largesign \x00C0 4-1      [C0] upper a grave
largesign \x00E0   4-1      [E0] lower a grave

largesign \x00C1 4-1      [C1] upper a acute
largesign \x00E1   4-1      [E1] lower a acute

largesign \x00C2 4-1      [C2] upper a circumflex
largesign \x00E2   4-1      [E2] lower a circumflex

largesign \x00C3 4-1      [C3] upper a tilde
largesign \x00E3   4-1      [E3] lower a tilde

largesign \x00C4 4-1      [C4] upper a dieresis
largesign \x00E4   4-1      [E4] lower a dieresis

largesign \x00C5 4-1      [C5] upper a ring
largesign \x00E5   4-1      [E5] lower a ring

largesign \x00C6 1-15     [C6] upper ae
largesign \x00E6   1-15			[E6] lower ae

largesign \x00C7 4-14     [C7] upper c cedilla
largesign \x00E7   4-14     [E7] lower c cedilla

largesign \x00C8 4-15     [C8] upper e grave
largesign \x00E8   4-15     [E8] lower e grave

largesign \x00C9 4-15     [C9] upper e acute
largesign \x00E9   4-15     [E9] lower e acute

largesign \x00CA 4-15     [CA] upper e circumflex
largesign \x00EA   4-15     [EA] lower e circumflex

largesign \x00CB 4-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
largesign \x00EB   4-15     [EB] lower e dieresis

largesign \x00CC 4-24     [CC] upper i grave
largesign \x00EC   4-24     [EC] lower i grave

largesign \x00CD 4-24     [CD] upper i acute
largesign \x00ED   4-24     [ED] lower i acute

largesign \x00CE 4-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
largesign \x00EE   4-24     [EE] lower i circumflex

largesign \x00CF 4-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
largesign \x00EF   4-24     [EF] lower i dieresis

largesign \x00D0 4-15     [D0] upper eth
largesign \x00F0   4-15     [F0] lower eth

largesign \x00D1 4-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
largesign \x00F1   4-1345   [F1] lower n tilde

largesign \x00D2 4-135    [D2] upper o grave
largesign \x00F2   4-135    [F2] lower o grave

largesign \x00D3 4-135    [D3] upper o acute
largesign \x00F3   4-135    [F3] lower o acute

largesign \x00D4 4-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
largesign \x00F4   4-135    [F4] lower o circumflex

largesign \x00D5 4-135    [D5] upper o tilde
largesign \x00F5   4-135    [F5] lower o tilde

largesign \x00D6 4-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
largesign \x00F6   4-135			[F6] lower o dieresis

largesign \x00D8 4-135    [D8] upper o slash
largesign \x00f8   4-135    [F8] lower o slash

largesign \x00D9 4-136    [D9] upper u grave
largesign \x00F9   4-136    [F9] lower u grave

largesign \x00DA 4-136    [DA] upper u acute
largesign \x00FA   4-136    [FA] lower u acute

largesign \x00DB 4-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
largesign \x00FB   4-136    [FB] lower u circumflex

largesign \x00DC 4-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
largesign \x00FC   4-136    [FC] lower u dieresis

largesign \x00DD 4-13456  [DD] upper y acute
largesign \x00FD   4-13456  [FD] lower y acute

largesign \x00DE 4-2345   [DE] upper t horn
largesign \x00FE   4-2345   [FE] lower t horn

largesign \x00DF 234-234 (DF) lower ss


largesign \x0174 4-2456 lower w circumflex
largesign \x0175 4-2456 upper w circumflex

largesign \x0176 4-13456 upper y circumflex
largesign \x0177 4-13456 lower y circumflex

largesign \x0178 4-13456 upper y with dieresis
largesign \x00FF 4-13456 lower y with dieresis

largesign \x1EF2 4-13456 upper y with grave
largesign \x1EF3 4-13456 lower y with grave

hyphen 	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen

# punctuation \x2011 36		 # 8209			non-breaking hyphen
punctuation \x2011 23478	# 8209  non-breaking hyphen

punctuation \x2212 36
noback always \x2212 36
always \s\x2212\s 36-36
midnum \x2013 36-3456
always	\x2013 56-36		 # 8211		smart minus sign


noback always	\x201C 236	 # 8220			smart opening double quote
noback always	\x201D 356	 # 8221			smart closing double quote
noback always	\x201E 236	 # 8222			smart double low quotation mark
noback always	\x201F 356	 # 8223			smart double high reverse quotation mark

# Uppercase letters
base uppercase \x00C0 \x00E0		# a with grave
base uppercase \x00C1 \x00E1		# a with acute
base uppercase \x00C2 \x00E2		# a with circumflex
base uppercase \x00C3 \x00E3		# a with tilde
base uppercase \x00C4 \x00E4		# a with dieresis
base uppercase \x00C5 \x00E5		# a with ring above
base uppercase \x00C6 \x00E6		# letter ae
base uppercase \x00C7 \x00E7		# c with cedilla
base uppercase \x00C8 \x00E8		# e with grave
base uppercase \x00C9 \x00E9		# e with acute
base uppercase \x00CA \x00EA		# e with circumflex
base uppercase \x00CB \x00EB		# e with dieresis
base uppercase \x00CC \x00EC		# i with grave above
base uppercase \x00CD \x00ED		# i with acute above
base uppercase \x00CE \x00EE		# i with circumflex
base uppercase \x00CF \x00EF		# i with dieresis
base uppercase \x00D0 \x00F0		# letter eth
base uppercase \x00D1 \x00F1		# n with tilde
base uppercase \x00D2 \x00F2		# o with grave above
base uppercase \x00D3 \x00F3		# o with acute above
base uppercase \x00D4 \x00F4		# o with circumflex
base uppercase \x00D5 \x00F5		# o with tilde
base uppercase \x00D6 \x00F6		# o with dieresis
base uppercase \x00D8 \x00F8		# o with stroke
base uppercase \x00D9 \x00F9		# u with grave above
base uppercase \x00DA \x00FA		# u with acute above
base uppercase \x00DB \x00FB		# u with circumflex above
base uppercase \x00DC \x00FC		# u with dieeresis
base uppercase \x00DD \x00FD		# y with acute above
base uppercase \x00DE \x00FE		# letter thorn
base uppercase \x0174 \x0175		# w with circumflex
base uppercase \x0176 \x0177		# y with circumflex
base uppercase \x0178 \x00ff		# y with diaeresis
base uppercase \x1EF2 \x1EF3		# y with grave

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
multind 56-6 letsign capsletter
letsign 56
capsletter 6
begcapsword 6-6
endcapsword 6-3
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
begemph italic 46
endemph italic 46-3
begemph bold 46-46
endemph bold 46-3
begcomp 6-346
endcomp 6-346

# the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti

# Letters are defined in en-chardefs

#single letter words
largesign a 1
largesign A 1
word I 24
word O 135
word o 135

# abbreviations
contraction ie
word i.e. 24-256-15-256
contraction ok
word o.k. 135-256-13-256
contraction eg

# Roman Numerals
contraction ii
contraction iii
contraction iv
contraction vi
contraction vii
contraction viii
contraction ix
contraction xi
contraction xii
contraction xiii


# punctuation
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always \s-" 36-36-356
always \s-” 36-36-356
always ..." 3-3-3-356
always …" 3-3-3-356
always ...” 3-3-3-356
always …” 3-3-3-356
always ?" 236-356
word " 236
begnum ' 3
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
postpunc '' 356
postpunc ''' 356-3-356
